District of Columbia statutes.
32-1345

Reporting requirements.

(a)

The Office of Human Rights shall maintain data on the number of complaints filed pursuant to this subchapter, demographic information on the complainants, the number of investigations it conducts, and the disposition of every complaint and investigation.

(b)

Data maintained by the Office of Human Rights pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be submitted to the Council annually, beginning one year from the December 17, 2014.

(c)

Eighteen months after December 17, 2014, the Office of the District of Columbia Auditor (“ODCA”) shall provide the Council with a report, using information that ODCA may request from relevant government agencies, nonprofit organizations, and employers that are willing to voluntarily provide data, on the hiring of applicants with criminal backgrounds by employers and the impact of this subchapter on employers.

Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-152, § 6, 61 DCR 8904